Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-8] Tax imposed; credit for tax paid
other state. (a) A state tax return shall be filed in the case of every
decedent whose estate is required by the laws of the United States to file a
federal estate tax return. This section shall apply to a decedent who, at the
time of death was:

(1) A resident of the State; or

(2) A nonresident of the State whose gross estate
includes any real property situated in the State or tangible personal property
having a situs in the State.

(b) With respect to the estates of decedents
dying after January 25, 2012, the tax based on the Hawaii net taxable estate
shall be as provided in the following schedule:

If the Hawaii net taxable

estate is: The tax shall be:

$1,000,000 or less 10.0% of the Hawaii
net

taxable estate

Over $1,000,000 but $100,000 plus 11.0%
of the

not over $2,000,000 amount by which
the Hawaii

net taxable estate

exceeds $1,000,000

Over $2,000,000 but $210,000 plus 12%
of the

not over $3,000,000 amount by which
the Hawaii

net taxable
estate

exceeds
$2,000,000

Over $3,000,000 but $330,000 plus 13%
of the

not over $4,000,000 amount by which
the Hawaii

net taxable
estate

exceeds
$3,000,000

Over $4,000,000 but $460,000 plus 14%
of the

not over $5,000,000 amount by which
the Hawaii

net taxable
estate

exceeds
$4,000,000

Over $5,000,000 $600,000 plus 15.7%
of the

amount by which
the Hawaii

net taxable
estate

exceeds
$5,000,000.

(c) If any property of a resident is subject
to a death tax imposed by another state and if the tax imposed by the other
state is not qualified by a reciprocal provision allowing the property to be
taxed in the state of the decedent's domicile, the amount of the tax due under
this section shall be credited with the lesser of:

(1) The amount of the death tax actually paid to the
other state; or

(2) An amount computed by multiplying the Hawaii
estate tax by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the property
subject to the death tax imposed by the other state, and the denominator of
which is the total value of the decedent's gross estate.

(d) Except as otherwise expressly provided,
for purposes of this chapter, the gross value of transferred property shall be
its value as finally determined for purposes of the federal transfer tax. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next